Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.271

Rules for reciprocity in bidding.

The director shall adopt and apply rules designed to provide for some reciprocity in bidding between Washington and those states having statutes or regulations on the list under RCW 39.26.270. The director shall have broad discretionary power in developing these rules and the rules shall provide for reciprocity only to the extent and in those instances where the director considers it appropriate. For the purpose of determining the lowest responsible bidder pursuant to RCW 39.26.160, such rules shall (1) require the director to impose a reciprocity increase on bids when appropriate under the rules and (2) establish methods for determining the amount of the increase. In no instance shall such increase, if any, be paid to a vendor whose bid is accepted.

[ 2015 c 79 s 9; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 241; 1983 c 183 s 3. Formerly RCW 43.19.704.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.